apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="goun/it__vblex">
      <e><p><l>it</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezet</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezan</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezez</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezomp</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezit</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezont</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezer</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezen</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezes</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eze</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezemp</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezec’h</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezent</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezed</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezis</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezjout</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezas</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezjomp</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezjoc’h</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezjont</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezjod</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezin</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezi</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezo</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezimp</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezot</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ezoc’h</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezint</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezor</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezfen</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezfes</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezfe</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezfemp</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezfec’h</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezfent</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezfed</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezjen</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezjes</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezje</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezjemp</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezjec’h</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezjent</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezjed</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezet</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezomp</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezit</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezent</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="adc’hounit"><i>adc’houn</i><par n="goun/it__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="adgounit" r="LR"><i>adgoun</i><par n="goun/it__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gounit"><par n="initial-g"/><i>oun</i><par n="goun/it__vblex"/></e>
